Idaho statutes. Title 16 JUVENILE PROCEEDINGS
Chapter 24 CHILDREN’S MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES
§ 16-2418. Criteria for one hundred twenty day involuntary treatment order.

A child may be treated involuntarily, and placed at a facility, according to the disposition of the department under section 16-2415, Idaho Code, for a period of up to one hundred twenty (120) days if, after the hearing provided in section 16-2417, Idaho Code, the court determines on the basis of clear and convincing evidence that:

The child is suffering from severe emotional disturbance; and

There is reasonable prospect that his illness is treatable by a facility or program operated by the department or other facility available to the department for treatment of children with serious emotional disturbance; and

A child’s parent or guardian refuses or is unable to adequately provide for the treatment of the child consistent with the requirements of public safety; and

As the result of serious emotional disturbance, the child is:

Likely to cause harm to himself or suffer substantial mental or physical deterioration; or

Likely to cause harm to others.

Within seven (7) days after entry of the order for involuntary commitment, the department of health and welfare shall develop a plan of treatment to be approved by the court which includes:

A proposed placement and projections for aftercare upon completion of treatment;

Specific behavioral goals by which the success of the treatment can be measured; and

Evidence of attempts to involve the patient and the patient’s family in the development of the plan.

The plan of treatment shall be consistent with the least restrictive alternative principle.

The court may conduct a review hearing at any time to monitor compliance and to make any significant adjustment from the plan of treatment during the period of involuntary commitment.

§ 16-2419. Effect of involuntary treatment orders on parental rights and custody.

If an order for involuntary treatment is issued, the parents, guardian or custodian of the child will retain all parental rights, including legal custody of the child, or the orders for involuntary treatment and disposition. The department of health and welfare shall acquire physical custody of the child and the right to determine the disposition and placement of the child whenever the placement requires the expenditure of public funds as provided in section 16-2415, Idaho Code, consistent with the plan of treatment approved by the court.

§ 16-2420. Successive periods of involuntary treatment.

Any order for involuntary treatment pursuant to section 16-2416, Idaho Code, may be renewed. At the time of expiration of a one hundred twenty (120) day involuntary treatment order, authority for continued involuntary treatment may be extended for periods of up to one hundred eighty (180) days upon a petition filed with the court by the treatment facility or by the child’s parent, or guardian, or other interested party.

The petition shall include a statement why the child still meets the criteria for involuntary treatment, what treatment has been provided and what progress has been made, why a further period of involuntary treatment is warranted, and the identity of any person who has knowledge concerning the case. The petition shall be promptly served upon the child, the child’s parent, custodian, or guardian, and the child’s attorney.

The child shall be entitled to a hearing before the court on the petition on or before the first business day following expiration of the operative period of involuntary treatment and shall have the same rights to which he was entitled at the initial hearing on involuntary treatment in section 16-2417, Idaho Code.

The court shall order that the child be discharged unless it determines by clear and convincing evidence that:

The child still satisfies the criteria for involuntary treatment; and

That there is a reasonable prospect that a substantial therapeutic purpose would be served by a further period of involuntary treatment.

Additional involuntary treatment orders for periods up to one hundred eighty (180) days each may be ordered in accordance with this section.

§ 16-2421. Waiver of right to be present at hearings.

A child may waive the right to be present at any hearing to which he is entitled under this section by filing a written waiver that the court finds is knowingly and voluntarily executed by the child. The child’s attorney shall consult with him and determine whether the child understands his rights and desires to waive his right to be present at the hearing. The attorney shall then submit a verified written statement to the court explaining the attorney’s understanding of the child’s intent. By waiving the right to be present at the hearing, the child waives no other rights.

§ 16-2422. Informed consent to medication or other treatment — Persons under voluntary treatment.

A facility may not administer any treatments or medications to a child admitted to the facility as a voluntary patient under section 16-2407, Idaho Code, unless the parent, guardian or custodian of the child has given informed consent to the treatment, except that emergency or medically necessary treatments may be given without informed consent, if delay in treatment may cause harm to the child, and the parent, guardian, or custodian of the child is not available.

After informed consent has been given, the parent, guardian or custodian of a child may revoke such consent at any time, by clearly communicating such revocation to facility staff. When consent has been revoked, the facility shall promptly discontinue the treatment, provided that a course of treatment may be concluded or phased out where necessary to avoid the harmful effects of abrupt withdrawal. The facility may require the parent, guardian, or custodian to sign a written revocation of consent before discontinuing the treatment.

Except in an emergency situation, the parents of a child being treated voluntarily shall have the right to refuse any and all medications or other treatments. If appropriate medications or treatments are refused, and the facility is unable to care for the child without such treatments, the facility may then discharge the child, with due care for his safety. Neither the facility nor providers shall be held liable. If the child appears to meet the criteria for involuntary treatment as specified in section 16-2418, Idaho Code, the facility may file a petition for involuntary treatment.

§ 16-2423. Informed consent to medication or other treatment — Persons subject to involuntary or emergency treatment.

During an emergency evaluation under section 16-2413, Idaho Code, or during a period of involuntary treatment ordered under section 16-2418, Idaho Code, the treatment facility may administer necessary medications or other treatments, except for electroconvulsive treatments, to a child, consistent with good medical practice without the informed consent of the parent of the child, if it is not possible to obtain such consent.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, a treatment facility shall not administer experimental treatment or any other special therapy except as provided by law or in rules promulgated by the department.

No psychosurgery or electroconvulsive treatment shall be performed on a child, except by order of a court upon a finding that the treatment is necessary to prevent serious harm to the child. Consent of the parent of a child to this treatment without a court order shall be invalid and shall not be a defense against any legal action that might be brought against the provider of the treatment.

Consent for other medical/surgical treatments not intended primarily to treat a child’s serious emotional disturbance shall be obtained in accordance with the applicable law.

§ 16-2424. Provision of treatment.

Every child subject to an involuntary treatment order under this chapter shall be provided with appropriate treatment in accordance with the least restrictive alternative principle that offers him a realistic prospect of improvement. Children shall be afforded treatment in facilities that conform to the applicable rules of the department, and that are able to adequately care for and treat the persons they serve.

A written individual treatment plan shall be prepared, with the participation of the child (to the extent he is able), his family and any other persons of his choice, during voluntary admission or emergency psychiatric evaluation or, within seven (7) days of the signing of an order for involuntary treatment. The individual treatment plan shall be approved by the responsible physician, and the course of treatment actually administered shall conform to the plan.

The child’s progress in attaining the objectives in the treatment plan shall be noted in his records, and the revisions to the plan shall be made as necessary. The child and the child’s parent, custodian, or guardian shall be afforded an opportunity to participate in any substantial revision of the treatment plan.

A copy of the individual treatment plan shall be given to the child, his parents and to any other person designated by him, provided that the responsible physician may preclude disclosure of the individual treatment plan to the child if he states in writing why disclosure would be harmful to the child.

§ 16-2425. Rights of children in treatment facilities.

Competence. No right of any child shall be denied or reduced solely by the reason of his having been evaluated, or treated under this chapter. A finding of lack of capacity to make an informed decision under this chapter shall not by itself establish lack of competence for any other purpose.

Right to treatment. Children subject to an involuntary treatment order under this chapter shall have the right to treatment to the extent provided in section 16-2424, Idaho Code.

Healthful and humane environment. Every child shall have the right to a healthful and humane environment. Every facility shall provide a clean, safe and comfortable environment in a structure that complies with applicable licensing requirements governing physical facilities, nutrition, health and safety, and medical services, and for aspects of care for which there are no mandatory requirements, consistent with the generally accepted professional standards in Idaho. In addition, every child shall have the right to a humane psychological environment that protects him from harm or abuse, provides reasonable privacy, promotes personal dignity, and provides opportunity for improved functioning.

Leaves of absence. Leaves of absence may be granted in appropriate cases at the discretion of the treatment facility. Police officers are authorized to and shall, at the request of a treatment facility, take into protective custody and return to the treatment facility any child who is subject to an order for involuntary treatment and placed by the department and any child placed by the authority of his parents who leaves without proper authorization or does not return at the end of an authorized leave of absence. The child’s parent or guardian shall be notified before any leave of absence occurs and in the event that a child is away without authorization, they shall be notified immediately.

Restraints and seclusion. Every child shall have the right to be free from unnecessary or inappropriate restraints or seclusion consistent with the least restrictive alternative principle. Restraints and seclusion shall be administered only in conformity with rules adopted by the department.

Corporal punishment. Every child shall have the right to be free from corporal punishment.

Nutrition. Every child shall have the right to a nutritionally sound and medically appropriate diet.

Exercise and recreation. Every child shall have reasonable opportunities for physical and outdoor exercise and access to recreational equipment. Reasonable limitations may be set by general rules or, for clinical reasons, in particular cases.

Visitors. Every child shall have the right to receive visitors with reasonable privacy as is consistent with the treatment plan.

Hours during which visitors may be received shall be limited only in the interest of effective treatment and efficiency of the facility and shall be sufficiently flexible to accommodate the individual needs of the child and his visitors.

Notwithstanding the above, each resident has the right to receive visits from his physician, psychologist, clergyman or social worker in private, irrespective of visiting hours, provided that the visitor shows reasonable cause for visiting at times other than normal visiting hours.
(c) A facility may impose conditions on visits and privacy of visits if there is reason to believe that a visitor poses a substantial risk of harm to the child, or others.

A treatment facility shall provide reasonable assistance to children in exercising their communication rights. Reasonable limitations on the use of the mail and telephones may be set by general rules. In cases of personal emergencies when other means of communication are not satisfactory, the child shall be afforded reasonable use of long-distance calls. A child who is indigent shall be furnished writing, postage and telephone facilities without charge.

Communications. (a) Every child shall have the right to send and receive mail. Reasonable rules governing inspection (but not reading) of incoming mail may be established, provided that they are necessary for substantial health care purposes and that they preserve the child’s rights of privacy to the extent compatible with his clinical status.

Practice of religion. Every child shall have the right to practice or refrain from practice of a religion. No child shall be subjected to pressure, rewards or punishments based on his decision to practice or refrain from practice of religion or of any particular religion. The treatment facility is not required to provide special assistance to persons so that they may practice a religion.

Personal possessions. Every child shall have the right to keep, use and store personal possessions and to maintain and use bank accounts and other sources of personal funds, unless precluded from doing so by order of the court. Reasonable limitations may be set by general rules or, for clinical reasons, in particular cases.

Nonretaliation. No child shall be subjected to retaliation or to any adverse change of conditions or treatment because of having asserted his rights.

Access to counsel. A child may at any time have a telephone conversation with or be visited by his lawyer or any employee of his attorney’s firm, or a representative of the state protection and advocacy system.

Medication. Each child has the right to be free from unnecessary or excessive medication.

Right to education. A child who is in a treatment facility shall be provided education and training as necessary to encourage and stimulate developmental progress and achievement and as required by state and federal law. In no event shall a child be allowed to remain in a treatment facility for more than ten (10) days without receiving educational services.

(b) Every child shall have the right to reasonably private access to telephones, including the right to make long-distance calls to the extent he can arrange for payment for such calls.

§ 16-2426. Notification of rights.

At the time of admission to a facility, whether the admission is voluntary or involuntary, the facility shall insure that the child is fully informed of his rights in terms that he can understand. This information shall be provided both orally and in writing. Copies of the written explanation of the child’s rights and a written, signed acknowledgement by the child and his parent that he has read and understands the rights, shall be kept in the child’s records and made available for inspection by representatives of the child and employees of the state protection and advocacy system. A statement of rights shall be posted in a common area of the facility available to residents and plainly visible.

§ 16-2427. Discharge.

The responsible physician shall review periodically whether a child meets the criteria for involuntary treatment, and if he concludes that the person does not meet such criteria, he shall undertake discharge procedures.

Discharge of any child may be delayed for a reasonable period of time in order to arrange transportation or lodging for the child, or for other good cause to protect the safety or well-being of the child.

Involuntary treatment after discharge. A child who has been discharged from emergency evaluation, one hundred twenty (120) day involuntary treatment or a subsequent period of involuntary treatment may be subjected to further involuntary treatment only pursuant to the procedures provided in this chapter and upon a showing of new circumstances warranting such involuntary treatment which were not known at the time of discharge.

Release to outpatient treatment. The responsible physician may, as part of an individual treatment plan for a child who is subject to involuntary treatment, release such child to outpatient treatment upon the condition that, if the child fails to follow through with, or respond acceptably to, such outpatient treatment, he may be returned to inpatient treatment without a court hearing during the effective period of the order, or until he meets the criteria for voluntary treatment or discharge. Within seventy-two (72) hours of his return to the facility, there must be an administrative review to determine if inpatient treatment is necessary. The review hearing must be conducted by the facility director or his designee, a physician, a social worker, psychologist, or nurse. The child and his parent, or guardian shall be given an opportunity to be represented by counsel and to present evidence and testimony.

Habeas corpus. Nothing in this chapter shall limit other legal rights or remedies concerning discharge which a person may have pursuant to law, rule, regulation or policy, including the right to petition for a writ of habeas corpus.

§ 16-2428. Confidentiality and disclosure of information.

All certificates, applications, records, and reports directly or indirectly identifying a patient or former patient or an individual whose involuntary treatment has been sought under this chapter shall be kept confidential and shall not be disclosed by any person except with the consent of the person identified or his legal guardian, if any, or as disclosure may be necessary to carry out any of the provisions of this chapter, or as a court may direct upon its determination that disclosure is necessary and that failure to make such disclosure would be contrary to public interest.

No person in possession of confidential statements made by a child over the age of fourteen (14) years in the course of treatment may disclose such information to the child’s parent or others without the written permission of the child, unless such disclosure is necessary to obtain insurance coverage, to carry out the treatment plan or to prevent harm to the child or others, or unless authorized to disclose such information by order of a court.

The child has the right of access to information regarding his treatment and has the right to have copies of information and to submit clarifying or correcting statements and other documentation of reasonable length for inclusion with his treatment record.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the denial of access to records by a child when a physician or other mental health professional believes and notes in the child’s medical records that the disclosure would be damaging to the child. In any case, the child has the right to petition the court for an order granting access.

Access to records by the state protection and advocacy system shall be governed by 42 U.S.C. 10801 et seq., as amended.

§ 16-2429. Right to representation.

Every child has the right to counsel to represent him at all proceedings under this chapter and to obtain the advice of an attorney at any time regarding his status under this chapter, at his or his parents’ expense. When a child has not retained an attorney and is unable to do so, or the child and his parents are unable to afford one, and proceedings under this chapter have been initiated in court, the court shall appoint an attorney to represent him in court proceedings.

Every treatment facility shall establish a fair procedure for the assertion, resolution, and redress of grievances, and attempt to resolve problems and protect the rights of people treated by the facility. The child shall have the right to have a representative present at these proceedings, but not at public expense.

§ 16-2430. Transportation.

Following disposition by the department, it is the responsibility of the county sheriff to transport the person to the treatment facility. The department must notify the sheriff of the designated treatment facility within twenty-four (24) hours of the entry of the department’s disposition order. The county and the department shall allow for transportation by a family member or a member of the family and children’s services regional program staff whenever possible and determined to be in the best interests of the child.

§ 16-2431. Cost of involuntary treatment proceedings.

All costs associated with the involuntary treatment proceedings, including usual and customary fees of designated examiners, transportation costs and all medical, psychiatric and hospital costs, shall be the responsibility of the parents of the child according to their ability to pay, based on the sliding fee scale established under section 16-2433, Idaho Code, or, if indigent, the county of such child’s residence after all personal, family and third party resources including medical assistance as authorized by title XIX of the social security act, as amended, are considered. The department shall assume responsibility for usual and customary treatment costs when the order for involuntary treatment is signed until the involuntary person is discharged and after all personal, family and third party resources are considered in accordance with section 66-354, Idaho Code. For the purposes of this section, “usual and customary treatment costs” includes room and board; support services rendered at a facility of the department; routine physical, medical, psychological and psychiatric examination and testing; and group and individual therapy, psychiatric treatment, medication and medical care which can be provided at a facility of the department or approved by the department. The term “usual and customary treatment costs” shall not include witness fees and expenses for court appearances. Counties shall have no responsibility for costs of voluntary treatment of children under this chapter. Counties shall have no responsibility to pay for the cost of involuntary treatment of children after the court order is signed. This section does not affect the right of any child to receive free mental health or developmental disability services under any publicly supported program or the right of any parent to reimbursement from, or payment on the child’s behalf by, any publicly supported program or private insurer.

§ 16-2432. False statements — Penalties.

Any person who knowingly and willfully gives false information or takes other wrongful action for the purpose of distorting, corrupting or interfering with the process provided in this chapter shall be subject to a civil fine, and shall be liable for injunctive relief and money damages, in addition to any other liability under law.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as diminishing or relieving any person from their duty to report instances of child neglect or abuse under chapter 16, title 16, Idaho Code, or any liability associated with failure to make such reports.

§ 16-2433. Department rules.

The director is authorized to promulgate rules necessary to implement this chapter that are consistent with its provisions including the development of a schedule of fees to be charged to parents by the department for services, based on the cost of services and the ability of parents to pay.

§ 16-2434. Construction.

As used in this chapter, pronouns refer to both male and female persons equally, and articles refer to singular and plural persons and things.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, it is the legislative intent that such invalidity not affect other provisions or applications which can be given effect apart from that which is invalidated, and to this end the provisions of this chapter shall be deemed severable.

This chapter is intended as a unified, general chapter covering its subject matter, and accordingly none of its provisions shall be deemed to be repealed by implication by subsequent legislation if such a construction can reasonably be avoided.